Utah statutes.
72-8-107.   County or city granting exemption from construction -- Not eligible to utilize funds under part.

(1)  This part may not be construed to substitute or replace the construction of curbs, gutters, sidewalks, or pedestrian safety devices by any counties or participating municipalities.  Funds expended under this part are in addition to funds normally used by counties and participating municipalities for pedestrian safety devices and may not be used in substitution for local funding.

(2)  If any county or participating municipalities or any of their agencies grant an exemption or deferral agreement for the construction of sidewalks, curbs, gutters, or pedestrian safety devices which are otherwise normally required, the area for which the exemption or deferral agreement applies is not be eligible to utilize funds permitted to be expended by this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

